Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Chapter 33. Sea Walls
§ 65-33-49.
Extension, construction, and repair.

In those counties operating under this chapter, the board of supervisors may borrow funds not in excess of three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000.00) at a rate of interest not exceeding six per cent. per annum, in addition to such sums as may have heretofore been borrowed, for the purpose of extending, constructing, repairing, or maintaining the road protection of the county or to protect by sea wall or road protection any street, highway, road, or avenue connected therewith extending to or along the side of a harbor or to a boat landing or dock, which, in the judgment of the board of supervisors of such county, should be so protected either for an existing or a contemplated road, street, highway, or avenue. Such board of supervisors shall have authority to acquire by purchase or otherwise a dredge boat and use and operate the same for the purpose of pumping a sand beach adjacent to such sea wall or road protection structure, and to pay for same out of any funds provided under this section or any funds collected under Section 65-33-47. The funds or amount borrowed for the purpose provided for in this section shall be paid within a period of ten years from the date borrowed, and shall be paid out of the funds collected under this chapter. All bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness maturing each year and the interest thereon, however, shall be first provided for and paid out of said funds. The loans authorized herein shall not be subject to other limitations, restrictions, or provisions of the general laws governing the borrowing of money, amounts of indebtedness, budget, and election; and said loans may be made by the board of supervisors of such county either by issuance of county bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing the same and shall be payable, both as to principal and interest, from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter. The money herein authorized to be borrowed may be borrowed by such board of supervisors from any person, firm, corporation, governmental lending agency, or from any sinking funds of such county, provided that if the money be borrowed from any sinking fund, it shall be repaid before the sinking fund from which it is borrowed, when supplemented by funds paid into same, is needed. Before the board of supervisors shall borrow money under this section, it shall spread on its minutes an order reciting such intention and shall thereafter publish a copy of such order, in two weekly issues of some newspaper having a general circulation in the county. If, within fifteen days after the first publication of a copy of such order, twenty-five per cent of the qualified electors of the county petition the board of supervisors for an election to determine whether or not the adoption of such order should be annulled, such election shall be ordered by such board of supervisors. If at such election a majority of those voting vote in favor of the adoption of such order, the same shall be valid and effective; but if a majority shall vote against such order, it shall be annulled and shall be ineffective, and no further effort shall be made to borrow funds under this section by such board for a period of six months from the date of such election. If no such petition be presented within fifteen days after the first publication of a copy of such order, such order shall be valid and effective. The amount authorized to be borrowed under this section may be borrowed at any time and in any amount, but the total borrowed shall not exceed three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000.00) in addition to such sums as may heretofore have been borrowed for the purposes herein enumerated, or either of them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6931; 1942, § 8516; Laws, 1930, ch. 87; Laws, 1936, ch. 274; Laws, 1938, ch. 312.

§ 65-33-51.
Authority for certain counties to borrow money and to receive federal aid.

In any county maintaining a sea wall or road protection structure under the provisions of this chapter, the board of supervisors may borrow funds not in excess of one million, five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00), at a rate of interest not exceeding four per cent per annum, in addition to such sums as have heretofore been borrowed for the purpose of constructing, repairing, strengthening, or maintaining the road protection structure or sea wall of the county. Such board of supervisors shall have the authority to acquire by purchase or otherwise a dredge boat and to use and operate it for the purpose of pumping a sand beach adjacent to such sea wall or road protection structure or for the maintenance thereof, and to pay for same out of any funds provided under this section. The funds or amount borrowed for the purposes provided for in this section shall be repaid within a period of fifteen years from the date borrowed, and shall be paid out of the funds collected under this chapter. All bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness maturing each year and the interest thereon, however, shall be first provided for and paid out of said funds. The loans authorized herein shall not be subject to other limitations, restrictions, or provisions of the general laws governing the borrowing of money, amounts of indebtedness, budget, and election; and said loans may be made by the board of supervisors of such county either by issuance of county bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing same and shall be payable, both as to principal and interest, from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter. The money herein authorized to be borrowed by such board of supervisors may be borrowed from any person, firm, corporation, governmental lending agency, or from any sinking funds of such county; if the money be borrowed from any sinking fund, it shall be repaid before the sinking fund from which it is borrowed, when supplemented by funds paid into same, is needed. Before the board of supervisors shall borrow money under this section, it shall spread on its minutes an order reciting such intention, and shall thereafter publish a copy of such order in three weekly issues of some newspaper having a general circulation in the county. If, within fifteen days after the first publication of a copy of such order, fifteen per cent of the qualified electors of the county shall file with such board of supervisors a petition in writing requesting an election on the question of borrowing money in the amount and for the purpose as set forth in such order, then such money shall not be borrowed unless authorized by a majority of the qualified voters of such county voting in an election to be ordered by such board of supervisors for that purpose. Notice of such election shall be given and such election shall be held and conducted as provided by law in connection with elections for the submission of bond issues in such county. If such proposition shall fail to receive such majority vote at such election, then no further proceedings for the borrowing of such money shall be had or taken within a period of six months from and after the date of such election. If, however, no such petition shall be so filed, or if at such election such petition shall be assented to by a majority vote, then such board of supervisors shall be authorized to borrow such money in the amount and for the purpose as set forth in such order as published. The amount authorized to be borrowed under this section may be borrowed at any time and in any amount, but the total borrowed shall not exceed one million, five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) in addition to such sums as may heretofore have been borrowed for the purposes herein enumerated, or either of them.

The board of supervisors is hereby given full power and authority to meet and do and grant any request of the United States Beach Erosion Board of the United States Army Engineers by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress, Chapter 960, 2nd Session, and to assure either or both the following:

Assure maintenance of the sea wall and drainage facilities, and of the beach by artificial replenishment, during the useful life of these works, as may be required to serve their intended purpose;

Provide, at the county’s own expense, all necessary land, easements, and rights of way;

To hold and save the United States free from all claims for damages that may arise either before, during, or after prosecution of the work;

To prevent, by ordinance, any water pollution that would endanger the health of the bathers;

To assume perpetual ownership of any beach construction and its administration for public use only, and that the board of supervisors is given full power and authority to do any and all things necessary in and about the repair and reconstruction, or construction or maintenance of the sea wall and sloping beach adjacent thereto; and it is given such power to cooperate with the requirements of the United States government to receive any grant or grants of money from Congress or to contribute any grant or grants to the United States Army Engineers in and about this construction and maintenance and it is further given full power and authority to employ engineers, lawyers, or any other professional or technical help in and about the completion of this project. In the event the county engineer is selected to do any or all of said work, the board of supervisors is hereby authorized to pay and allow him such reasonable fees or salary which, in its opinion, is necessary, just, and commensurate to the work done by him.

It is further given full power and authority to let, by competitive bids, any contract for the repair of said wall, or for the installation and drainage, and for the construction of any additional section of wall, together with any artificial beach adjacent to said wall; or it may, in its discretion, negotiate a contract for any and all construction or any part thereof for the construction, repair, reconstruction, or additions thereto; or it may do any or all of said work under the direction of the county engineer or engineers employed by it and for which purpose it may employ all necessary labor and equipment and purchase necessary materials.

The intent and purpose of this section is to give unto the respective boards of supervisors the full power and authority to carry out all the provisions herein, and to act independently, jointly, or severally with the United States government by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any county with an assessed valuation of less than $10,000,000.00.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8516.3; Laws, 1948, ch. 334, §§ 1-3.

§ 65-33-53.
Additional funds.

In any county maintaining a sea wall or road protection structure under the provisions of this chapter, the board of supervisors may borrow funds not in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) in addition to the one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000.00) authorized under Section 65-33-51, at the rate of interest not exceeding four per cent per annum, in addition to such sums as have heretofore been borrowed for the purpose of constructing, repairing, strengthening, or maintaining the road protection structure or sea wall of the county, including the raising of the roadbed as recommended and approved by the Mississippi State Highway Commission, and to construct retaining walls for such raised roadbeds and to pump by hydraulic fill, or otherwise, a sand beach adjacent to such retaining wall or sea wall structure. Such board of supervisors shall have the authority to acquire by purchase or otherwise a dredge boat and to use and operate it for the purpose of pumping a sand beach adjacent to such sea wall or road protection structure or for the maintenance thereof; however, said board of supervisors shall not pay for same out of any funds provided under this section. The funds or amount borrowed for the purposes provided in this section shall be repaid within a period of fifteen years from the date borrowed, and shall be paid out of the funds collected under this chapter. All bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness maturing each year and the interest thereon, however, shall be first provided for and paid out of said funds. The loans authorized herein shall not be subject to other limitations, restrictions, or provisions of the general laws governing the borrowing of money, amounts of indebtedness, budget, and election, and said loans may be made by the board of supervisors of such county either by issuance of county bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing same and shall be payable, both as to principal and interest, from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter, which sources of revenue and taxes are irrevocably pledged toward the repayment of any monies borrowed or any bonds issued under the provisions of this section. The money herein authorized to be borrowed by such board of supervisors may be borrowed from any person, firm, corporation, governmental lending agency, or from any sinking funds of such county; if the money be borrowed from any sinking fund, it shall be repaid before the sinking fund from which it is borrowed, when supplemented by funds paid into same, is needed. Before the board of supervisors shall borrow money under this section, it shall spread on its minutes an order reciting such intention and shall thereafter publish a copy of such order in three weekly issues of some newspaper having a general circulation in the county. If, within fifteen days after the first publication of a copy of such order, fifteen per cent of the qualified electors of the county shall file with such board of supervisors a petition in writing requesting an election on the question of borrowing money in the amount and for the purpose as set forth in such order, then such money shall not be borrowed unless authorized by a majority of the qualified voters of such county voting in an election to be ordered by such board of supervisors for that purpose. Notice of such election shall be given and such election shall be held and conducted as provided by law in connection with elections for the submission of bond issues in such county. If such proposition shall fail to receive such majority vote at such election, then no further proceedings for the borrowing of such money shall be had or taken within a period of six months from and after the date of such election. If, however, no such petition shall be so filed, or if at such election such petition shall be assented to by a majority vote, then such board of supervisors shall be authorized to borrow such money in the amount and for the purpose as set forth in such order as published. The amount authorized to be borrowed under this section may be borrowed at any time and in any amount, but the total borrowed shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) in addition to such sums as may heretofore have been borrowed for the purposes herein enumerated, or either of them, and especially in addition to any sums that may have heretofore been borrowed or in addition to any bonds that may have heretofore been issued under authority of Section 65-33-51. Any attorneys’ fees paid for the issuance of said bonds shall be paid out of the general fund of said county.

The board of supervisors is hereby given full power and authority to meet and do and grant any request of the United States beach erosion board of the United States army engineers by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress, Chapter 960, 2nd Session, and to assure either or both the following:

Assure maintenance of the sea wall and drainage facilities, and of the beach by artificial replenishment, during the useful life of these works, as may be required to serve their intended purpose;

Provide, at the county’s own expense, all necessary land, easements, and rights of way;

To hold and save the United States free from all claims for damages that may arise either before, during, or after prosecution of the work;

To prevent, by ordinance, any water pollution that would endanger the health of the bathers;

To assume perpetual ownership of any beach construction and its administration for public use only, and that the board of supervisors is given full power and authority to do any and all things necessary in and about the repair and reconstruction, or construction or maintenance of the sea wall and sloping beach adjacent thereto, built under the authority of this section, and it is given such power to cooperate with the requirements of the United States government to receive any grant or grants of money from congress or to contribute any grant or grants to the United States army engineers in and about this construction and maintenance, and it is further given full power and authority to employ engineers, lawyers, or any other professional or technical help in and about the completion of this project. In the event the county engineer is selected to do any or all of said work, the board of supervisors is hereby authorized to pay and allow him such reasonable fees or salary which, in its opinion, is necessary, just, and commensurate to work done by him.

It is further given full power and authority to let, by competitive bids, any contract for the repair of said wall, or for the installation and drainage, and for the construction of any additional section of wall, together with any artificial beach adjacent to said wall, and for the raising of any roadbeds and the construction of any such retaining wall.

The intent and purpose of this section is to give unto the respective boards the full power and authority to carry out all the provisions herein, and to act independently, jointly, or severally with the United States government by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any county with an assessed valuation of less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8516.4; Laws, 1952, ch. 214, §§ 1-3.

§ 65-33-55.
Additional counties authorized to borrow money and receive federal aid.

In any county maintaining a sea wall or road protection structure under provisions of this chapter and having an assessed valuation of five million dollars or less, the board of supervisors may borrow funds not in excess of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000.00), at a rate of interest not exceeding five per cent per annum, in addition to such sums as have heretofore been borrowed for the purpose of constructing, repairing, strengthening, or maintaining the road protection structure or sea wall of the county. Such board of supervisors shall have the authority to own a dredge boat and to use and operate it for the purpose of pumping a sand beach adjacent to such sea wall or road protection structure or for the maintenance thereof, and to pay for same out of any funds provided under this section. The funds or amount borrowed for the purposes provided in this section shall be repaid within a period of twenty years from the date borrowed, and shall be paid out of the funds collected under this chapter. All bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness maturing each year and the interest thereon, however, shall be first provided for and paid out of said funds. The loans authorized herein shall not be subject to other limitations, restrictions, or provisions of the general laws governing the borrowing of money, amounts of indebtedness, budget, and election; and said loans may be made by the board of supervisors of such county either by issuance of county bond, notes, or certificates of indebtedness which shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing same and shall be payable, both as to principal and interest, from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter. The money herein authorized to be borrowed by such board of supervisors may be borrowed from any person, firm, corporation, governmental lending agency, or from any sinking funds of such county; if the money be borrowed from any sinking fund, it shall be repaid before the sinking fund from which it is borrowed, when supplemented by funds paid into same, is needed. Before the board of supervisors shall borrow money under this section, it shall spread on its minutes an order reciting such intention, and shall call an election and submit the question of issuing bonds under this section to the qualified voters of such county in accordance with the present laws of issuing bonds. If a majority of the qualified electors voting in said election vote to issue said bonds, then the board of supervisors shall proceed to issue so much or such parts of said bonds not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000.00).

The board of supervisors is given full power and authority to do any and all things necessary in its opinion to obtain funds from the United States government by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress, Chapter 960, 2nd Session, or under any other law, and in and about the solicitation and preparation of any application; and it may do any and all things necessary in the promotion of obtaining relief under this act of congress for such county, and it is further given authority to assure the United States government, the United States beach erosion board, and the United States army engineers the following:

To hold and save the United States free from all claims for damages that may arise either before, during, or after prosecution of the work;

To prevent, by ordinance, any water pollution that would endanger the health of the bathers;

To assume perpetual ownership of any beach construction and its administration for public use only.

The intent and purpose of this section is to give unto the respective boards of supervisors the full power and authority to carry out all of the provisions herein, and to act independently, jointly, or severally with the United States government by and under Public Law 727, 79th Congress, or other laws.

Assure maintenance of the sea wall and drainage facilities, and of the beach by artificial replenishment, during the useful life of these works, as may be required to serve their intended purpose;

Provide, at the county’s own expense, all necessary land, easements, and rights of way;

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8516.5; Laws, 1948, ch. 335, §§ 1, 2.

§ 65-33-57.
New bonds authorized to cancel sinking fund obligations.

In any county wherein a seawall or road protection structure is maintained under the provisions of this chapter, which has invested surplus funds belonging to a road protection bond and interest sinking fund in the purchase of any notes, certificates of indebtedness, bonds, or other interest bearing obligations issued under the authority of Section 65-33-49, or refunding bonds issued or authorized to be issued in lieu thereof, and such notes, bonds, certificates of indebtedness, or refunding bonds are now held by such county for the use and benefit of such fund, and the board of supervisors of such county finds, by order spread upon its minutes, that the needs of such sinking fund demands it, or that it is to the best interest of the county to reduce such obligations so held to cash, such board of supervisors may authorize to be issued and issue and sell new road protection bonds in the aggregate amount of such notes, bonds, or certificates of indebtedness so held and authorized for the purpose of providing funds with which to take up, redeem, and cancel such obligations now held in such sinking fund. Upon the issuance of such road protection bonds, the said bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, and refunding bonds issued under authority of said section shall be cancelled.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8517; Laws, 1938, ch. 313.

§ 65-33-59.
Terms of new bonds.

Bonds issued under the authority of Sections 65-33-57 and 65-33-59 shall be full faith and credit obligations of the county issuing the same; shall mature within fifteen years of their date of issuance in such annual maturities and denominations as the board of supervisors may direct; shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed five and one half per centum per annum, payable semiannually; may be issued without notice or an election therefor; and shall not be subject to any limitation relative to amount of bonded debt. Such bonds and the interest thereon shall be payable both as to principal and interest from the same sources of revenue and taxes made available for the payment of road protection bonds under the provisions of this chapter. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to affect any of the provisions of House Bill No. 287 [ch. 130] as enacted at the Regular 1938 Session of the Mississippi Legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8518; Laws, 1938, ch. 313.

§ 65-33-61.
Refunding bonded indebtedness.

The board of supervisors of any county operating under the provisions of this chapter is hereby authorized to refund any bonded indebtedness of such county now outstanding, payable from the sources of revenue provided by this chapter, and to issue refunding bonds of such county, which shall be secured by and payable from the same sources of revenue as the bonds refunded thereby. The said refunding bonds may be issued by the board of supervisors of such county only after the question of the issue of said refunding bonds shall have been submitted to the qualified electors of such county at an election to be held for that purpose in said county, and only after the said issue has been authorized by a vote of three fifths of the qualified electors voting in an election to be ordered by the board of supervisors for that purpose, whenever any such board of supervisors shall find it necessary or advisable or in the best interest of such county so to do. Such refunding bonds may be issued only to redeem outstanding bonds at maturity, or on any date upon which outstanding bonds may be redeemable, or upon the voluntary surrender of outstanding bonds by the owners thereof. Such refunding bonds may be sold for not less than par and accrued interest, or may be exchanged for bonds to be refunded thereby; however, the issue of such refunding bonds shall be accomplished in such manner as to avoid payment by the county of interest on the refunding bonds and on the bonds refunded thereby for the same period of time.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8518-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 202, § 1.

§ 65-33-63.
Refunding bonds; interest; form; maturity.

Such refunding bonds shall bear such rate or rates of interest as may be determined by the board of supervisors, not exceeding, however, three and one-half per centum per annum, payable semiannually; shall be in such denomination or denominations and form as may be determined by the board of supervisors; shall be executed on behalf of the county by the president of the board of supervisors, countersigned by the clerk of such board; and the interest to accrue on such bonds shall be represented by coupons to be attached thereto, which may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers. Such refunding bonds shall mature in such amount or amounts and at such time or times, not exceeding twenty-five years from date thereof, as may be specified by the board of supervisors. All such refunding bonds and interest thereon shall be payable at the office of the state treasurer of the State of Mississippi in the city of Jackson, Mississippi, and a certified copy of the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such refunding bonds shall be filed in said office. The bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 65-33-61 through 65-33-71 shall in no way be construed as state obligations or state bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8518-02; Laws, 1944, ch. 202, § 2.

§ 65-33-65.
Sinking fund for refunding bonds.

The fact of the issuance and delivery of refunding bonds hereunder shall be certified by the clerk of the board of supervisors to the state Treasurer, who shall immediately register such bonds in a suitable bond register. Thereafter, the revenues and taxes which would otherwise be paid into the county treasury of such county for the payment of road protection and seawall bonds and interest thereon under the provisions of Section 65-33-45, shall be paid by the official collecting such taxes into the state treasury on a proper receive warrant of the state auditor to the credit of such county in a special fund to be designated “interest and sinking fund for road protection and seawall bonds of_______________County, Mississippi,” which fund shall be held and shall be applied by the state treasurer in the payment of interest accruing on such refunding bonds and the principal thereof at maturity, according to law. In the event that less than all of outstanding bonds payable under the provisions of this chapter shall be refunded as herein provided, then and in that event there shall be paid into the state treasury, for the credit of the aforesaid interest and sinking fund, only the proportion of the revenues and taxes as the amount of refunding bonds issued and outstanding bears to the total amount of outstanding bonds payable from the revenues herein referred to.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8518-03; Laws, 1944, ch. 202, § 3.

§ 65-33-67.
Tax levy to finance refunding bonds.

The board of supervisors of any county issuing refunding bonds under the provisions of Sections 65-33-61 through 65-33-65, shall levy an annual tax of not less than five mills on each dollar of the assessed valuation of taxable property within such county for the purpose of providing funds sufficient to pay such bonds at maturity and interest thereon as it accrues. The said tax shall be levied and collected as other county taxes are levied and collected, and the proceeds thereof shall be remitted by the county tax collector to the State Treasury at the time when state taxes are required by law to be so remitted. The State Treasurer shall credit the amount to the interest and sinking fund referred to in Section 65-33-65. On or before October 1st in each year, the State Treasurer shall certify to the board of supervisors of each such county the amount standing to the credit of such interest and sinking fund as of September 15th, of that year, and if such amount shall be sufficient (1) to pay all principal of and interest on such bonds then due and owing and (2) all principal of and interest on such refunding bonds maturing and accruing during the period of twelve months running from said September 15th, then and in that event such board of supervisors may reduce the aforesaid taxes or omit the same for the ensuing year, as such board may determine. All funds paid into the State Treasury hereunder shall remain in the State Treasury for the payment of principal and interest on such refunding bonds until all the principal and interest on such refunding bonds shall have been fully paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8518-04; Laws, 1944, ch. 202, § 4.

§ 65-33-69.
Fees and expenses for refunding bonds.

The board of supervisors shall pay all lawful fees of the chancery clerk and its attorney now prescribed by law, which fees are incidental to the execution of said refunding bonds, and may also pay all expenses in connection with the validation of said refunding bonds and procuring the opinion as to the validity thereof from some expert bond attorney, other than the state bond attorney, of national reputation. However, in cases where the bonds to be refunded are not due or redeemable prior to maturity, such board in procuring the surrender of such outstanding bonds may expend not exceeding an additional two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) of the principal amount of refunding bonds actually issued and delivered, but in no event shall any part of the said two and one-half percent (2 1/2%) be used in the payment of attorney’s fees. All such fees and compensation shall be paid out of the interest and sinking fund applicable to the bonds to be refunded, if the amount credited to such fund be adequate therefor. Otherwise, such fees and compensation shall be paid out of the proceeds of a special annual tax to be levied for that purpose by the board of supervisors upon all taxable property within such county. All expenses as authorized by Sections 65-33-61 through 65-33-71 in effectuating the exchange of said bonds and the actual expense of the state treasurer in paying principal and interest on said bonds shall be paid by the board of supervisors of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8518-05; Laws, 1944, ch. 202, § 5.

§ 65-33-71.
Full authority and powers conferred.

The provisions of Sections 65-33-61 through 65-33-71, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed full and complete authority for the issuance of refunding bonds as therein provided; and all powers necessary to be exercised by the board of supervisors of such counties, in order to carry out the provisions of said sections, are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8518-06; Laws, 1944, ch. 202, § 6.